dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX n0 erò on erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX n0 erò one erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX n0 erò ion [^cijɉñ]erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX n0 erò ione [^cijɉñ]erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX n0 ir on ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX n0 ir one ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX n0 r on [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX n0 r one [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX n0 ar en ar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX n0 ar ene ar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX n0 r n er	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX n0 r ne er	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX n0 rò n erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX n0 rò ne erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX n0 ir en ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX n0 ir ene ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX n0 ar é/J4I4 ar	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 er é/J4I4 er	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 erò é/J4I4 erò	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ir é/J4I4 ir	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 o é/J4I4 iso	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ar é ar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 er é er	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 erò é erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 ir é ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 o é iso	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar ede ar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar ege ar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 r de er	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 r ge er	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 rò de erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 rò ge erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 ir ede ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 ir ege ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 r ge ir	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 o ede iso	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 o ege iso	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX n0 ar é ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ar é-ge/R0 ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ar ége/R3 ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ar é-l/R1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ar égel/R4A1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 er é er	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 er é-ge/R0 er	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 er ége/R3 er	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 er é-l/R1 er	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 er égel/R4A1 er	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 erò é erò	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 erò é-ge/R0 erò	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 erò ége/R3 erò	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 erò é-l/R1 erò	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 erò égel/R4A1 erò	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ir é ir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ir é-ge/R0 ir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ir ége/R3 ir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ir é-l/R1 ir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ir égel/R4A1 ir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 o é iso	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX n0 o é-ge/R0 iso	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 o ége/R3 iso	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 o é-l/R1 iso	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 o égel/R4A1 iso	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + é
SFX n0 ar on ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ar on-ge/R0 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ar ónge/R3 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ar on-l/R1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ar óngel/R4A1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 er on er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 er on-ge/R0 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 er on-l/R1 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 er ónge/R3 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 er óngel/R4A1 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 erò on erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 erò on-ge/R0 erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 erò on-l/R1 erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 erò ónge/R3 erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 erò óngel/R4A1 erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ir on ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ir on-ge/R0 ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ir on-l/R1 ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ir ónge/R3 ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ir óngel/R4A1 ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX n0 ar en ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ar en-ge/R0 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ar en-l/R1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ar énge/R3 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ar éngel/R4A1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 r n er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 r n-ge/R0 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + én
SFX n0 r n-l/R1 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + én
SFX n0 er énge/R3 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 er éngel/R4A1 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 rò n erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 rò n-ge/R0 erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + én
SFX n0 rò n-l/R1 erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + én
SFX n0 erò énge/R3 erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 erò éngel/R4A1 erò	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ir en ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ir en-ge/R0 ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ir en-l/R1 ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ir énge/R3 ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 ir éngel/R4A1 ir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX n0 erò aree/J1 erò	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 erò aréemi/I1 erò	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 erò aree/J6 erò	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 ar eréemi/I6 ar	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e, T4 = T1: senŧa aŧento | à > é
SFX n0 ar eree/J3 ar	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e, T4 = T1: senŧa aŧento | à > é
SFX n0 ar eréetu/I3 ar	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e, T4 = T1: senŧa aŧento | à > é
SFX n0 ar eree/J4 ar	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e, T4 = T1: senŧa aŧento | à > é
SFX n0 ar eréeu/I4 ar	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e, T4 = T1: senŧa aŧento | à > é
SFX n0 ar ereve ar	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e, T4 = T1: senŧa aŧento | à > é
SFX n0 ar eree/J1 ar	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e, T4 = T1: senŧa aŧento | à > é
SFX n0 ar eree/J6 ar	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e, T4 = T1: senŧa aŧento | à > é
SFX n0 erò aréemi/I6 erò	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 erò aree/J3 erò	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 erò aréetu/I3 erò	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 erò aree/J4 erò	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 erò aréeu/I4 erò	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 erò aree erò	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX n0 er ut [^u]er	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oiae]

SFX N9 Y 2
SFX N9 o óni/I2 o	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T12 + ón
SFX N9 o éni/I2 o	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T12 + én
